District of Columbia statutes.
50-2301.06

Time computation.

In computing any period of time prescribed or allowed by this chapter, the day of the act, event or default from which the period of time begins to run shall not be included. The last day of the period so computed shall be included, unless it is a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday in which event the period runs until the end of the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. When the period of time prescribed or allowed is less than 7 days, intermediate Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays shall be excluded in the computation.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 106, 25 DCR 1275
1973 Ed., § 40-1106.
1981 Ed., § 40-606.